District of Columbia statutes.
47-1062

Bread for the City Community Garden.

The real property located in square 445, lots 198, 199, and 200, which is owned and used by Bread For The City as a community garden, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the property continues to be so owned and used, not used for commercial purposes, and subject to the provisions of § 47-1005, § 47-1007, and § 47-1009, as if the exemption were granted administratively under this chapter.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-283, § 2(b), 52 DCR 853